Washington statutes.
RCW 18.155.090

Application of uniform disciplinary act.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unauthorized practice, the issuance and denial of certificates, and the discipline of certified sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex offender treatment providers under this chapter.

[ 2004 c 38 s 8; 1990 c 3 s 809.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 38: See note following RCW 18.155.075.